Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.435

Change of name, address, type of entity, or jurisdiction of formation by noncommercial registered agent.

(1) If a noncommercial registered agent changes its name or its address in effect with respect to a represented entity under RCW 23.95.415(1), the agent shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing, with respect to each entity represented by the agent, a statement of change executed by the agent which states:

(a) The name of the entity;

(b) The name and address of the agent in effect with respect to the entity;

(c) If the name of the agent has changed, the new name; and

(d) If the address of the agent has changed, the new address.

(2) A noncommercial registered agent promptly shall furnish the represented entity with notice in a record of the delivery to the secretary of state for filing of a statement of change and the changes made in the statement.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1408.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.